Washington statutes.
RCW 2.20.020

Who are magistrates.

The following persons are magistrates:

(1) The justices of the supreme court.

(2) The judges of the court of appeals.

(3) The superior judges, and district judges.

(4) All municipal officers authorized to exercise the powers and perform the duties of district judges.

[ 1987 c 202 s 103; 1971 c 81 s 9; 1891 c 53 s 2; RRS s 51.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.